District of Columbia statutes.
31-1342

Distribution of assets.

Under the direction of the court, the liquidator shall pay distributions in a manner that will assure the proper recognition of priorities and a reasonable balance between the expeditious completion of the liquidation and the protection of unliquidated and undetermined claims, including third party claims. Distribution of assets in kind may be made at valuations set by agreement between the liquidator and the creditor and approved by the court.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 43, 40 DCR 5773
1981 Ed., § 35-2842.